local/apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.es.dix
    <pardef n="enc/ontrar__vblex">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontraríamos</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontraría</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontraríais</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrarías</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrarían</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontraría</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontraremos</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontraré</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontraréis</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrarás</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrarán</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrará</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ontráremos</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ontrare</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ontrareis</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ontrares</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ontraren</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ontrare</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrando</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrándo</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontramos</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontré</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrasteis</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontraste</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontraron</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontró</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontremos</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrémo</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantémo"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrémos</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantémos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrad</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontra</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
         <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrad</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantad"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrá</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrád</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantád"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uentra</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uéntra</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cánta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uentren</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uéntren</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uentre</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uéntre</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrar</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrar</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrár</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantár"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrábamos</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontraba</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrabais</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontrabas</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontraban</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontraba</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ontráramos</l>
          <r>ontrar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ontrásemos</l>

      <e lm="encontrar">
        <i>enc</i>
        <par n="enc/ontrar__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="reencontrar">
        <i>reenc</i>
        <par n="enc/ontrar__vblex"/>
      </e>
